Utah statutes.
9-9-201.   Assumption by state of criminal and civil jurisdiction over
Indians and Indian territory.
The state of Utah hereby obligates and binds itself to assume criminal and
civil jurisdiction over Indians and Indian territory, country, and lands or
any portion thereof within this state in accordance with the consent of the
United States given by the Act of Congress of April 11, 1968, 82 Stat. 78-80
(Public Law 284, 90th Congress), to the extent authorized by that act and this
chapter.
